Illinois, session 104th, HB4635.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Public Health to fund 7nursing education scholarships. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.